Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.665

Guardianship/conservatorship summary.

The guardianship/conservatorship summary shall be in or substantially similar form:

GUARDIANSHIP/CONSERVATORSHIP SUMMARY

Date Guardian/Conservator Appointed:

. . . .

Due Date for Report and Accounting:

. . . .

Date of Next Review:

. . . .

Letters Expire On:

. . . .

Bond Amount:

$. . . .

Restricted Account Agreements Required:

. . . .

Due Date for Inventory, if applicable:

. . . .

Due Date for Guardian's Plan, if applicable:

. . . .

Person subject to guardianship/conservatorship

Guardian/Conservator

Name:

Name:

Address:

Address:

Phone:

Phone:

Facsimile:

Facsimile:

Interested Parties

Address

Relation

[ 2019 c 437 s 606.]